Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1761.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; university of Arizona; Yuma center of excellence for desert agriculture; cooperative extension program; experiment stations; intent A. The sum of $1,600,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the university of Arizona for the Yuma center of excellence for desert agriculture. B. The following amounts in the following fiscal years are appropriated from the state general fund to the university of Arizona for the cooperative extension: 1. $2,700,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027. 2. $5,400,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028. 3. $8,100,000 in fiscal year 2028-2029. C. The following amounts in the following fiscal years are appropriated from the state general fund to the university of Arizona for the Arizona experiment station: 1. $18,300,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027. 2. $4,600,000  in fiscal year 2027-2028. 3. $7,000,000 in fiscal year 2028-2029. D. The legislature intends that the appropriation made in subsection A of this section be considered ongoing funding in future years.